New York, session 2025-2026, S5827.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 125 of the cannabis law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 13 to read as follows: 3 13. (a) No registered organization, licensee, or permittee or other 4 entity under the jurisdiction of the board shall sell, or agree to sell 5 or deliver in this state any edible cannabis product that is not in 6 child resistant packaging. 7 (b) For the purposes of this subdivision, "edible cannabis product" 8 shall mean a "cannabis-infused product" as defined in subdivision ten of 9 section three of this chapter that is intended for consumption. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 11 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 12 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 13 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 14 completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10395-01-5